California statutes. Unemployment Insurance Code
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Overpayments [3751. - 3751.]

3751.

The provisions of Article 4 (commencing with Section 1375) of Chapter 5 of Part 1 of this division are modified in the following respects:

(a) In the absence of fraud, misrepresentation, or willful nondisclosure, the notice of overpayment of extended duration benefits shall be served by the Employment Development Department not later than one year after the close of the extended duration period in which the overpayment was made.

(b) The Director of Employment Development may offset an overpayment of extended duration benefits, or federal-state extended benefits, or unemployment compensation benefits against any of such three types of benefits or against disability benefits to which the liable person may become entitled under this division. The Director of Employment Development may offset the amount of any such overpayments within any of the periods prescribed by subdivision (b) of Section 1379, and further within the current extended duration period or current extended benefit period established under Part 4 (commencing with Section 4001) of this division or any extended benefit period or any extended duration period which begins during the
 three-year period next succeeding the date of the service of such notice of overpayment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 67, Sec. 38.   (SB 191)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. FEDERAL-STATE EXTENDED COMPENSATION [4001. - 4751.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [4001. - 4004.]

4001.

The purpose of this part is to provide that payment of extended compensation, in accordance with the “Federal-State Extended Unemployment Compensation Act of 1970”, as amended by the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1981 (Public Law 97-35), shall be made, for any week of unemployment which begins in the individual’s eligibility period, to individuals who have exhausted all rights to regular compensation under this division and who have no rights to regular compensation with respect to such week under this division or any other state unemployment compensation law or to compensation under any other federal law. For purposes of this section, an individual shall have exhausted his rights to regular compensation under any state law (A) when no payments of regular compensation can be made under such law because such individual has received all regular compensation available to him based on wage credits for his base period, or (B) when his rights to such compensation have terminated by reason of the expiration of the benefit year with respect to which such rights existed. Except where inconsistent with the provisions of the “Federal-State Extended Unemployment Compensation Act of 1970”, as amended by the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1981 (Public Law 97-35), the terms and conditions of this division which apply to claims for regular compensation and to the payment thereof shall apply to claims for extended compensation and to the payment thereof under such federal act. This part shall be operative on September 25, 1982, and extended compensation shall be payable as provided by the Federal-State Extended Unemployment Compensation Act of 1970, as amended by the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1981 (Public Law 97-35), subject to limitations provided by that act, with respect to weeks of unemployment and extended benefit periods beginning after September 25, 1982. The provisions of this section in effect prior to the amendments by the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1981 shall continue to apply to weeks beginning after November 28, 1970, and before September 25, 1982.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1072, Sec. 6.   Effective September 15, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

4002.

(a) Except as otherwise provided, the provisions and definitions of Part 1 (commencing with Section 100) apply to this part. In case of any conflict between the provisions of Part 1 and the provisions of this part, the provisions of this part shall prevail with respect to federal-state extended benefits.

(b) Except as otherwise provided, subdivision (d) of Section 1253, and Sections 1030, 1032, 1254, 1277, 1281, 1327, 1328, 1329, 1330, and 1331 do not apply to this part.

(c) The provisions of Part 2 (commencing with Section 2601) of, and of Part 3 (commencing with Section 3501) do not apply to this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1488, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

4003.

(a) The provisions and definitions of terms in the Federal-State Extended Unemployment Compensation Act of 1970, as amended by the federal Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1981 (Public Law 97-35), apply to this part. “Federal-state extended benefits” means benefits payable under this part.

(b) (1) To the extent that the provisions and definitions of terms in the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5) are in effect in federal law and are in conflict with, or supplement the provisions and definitions applicable pursuant to subdivision (a), the provisions and definitions of the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 shall apply to this part.

(2) To the extent that the provisions and definitions of terms in the federal Families First Coronavirus Response Act (Public Law 116-127) are in effect in federal law and are in conflict with, or supplement the provisions and definitions applicable pursuant to, subdivision (a), the provisions and definitions of the federal Families First Coronavirus Response Act shall apply to this part.

(c) There is an “on” indicator for purposes of federal-state extended benefits for a week if one of the following applies:

(1) The rate of insured unemployment under this part for the period consisting of that week and the 12 weeks immediately preceding the week equaled or exceeded 120 percent of the average of the rates for the corresponding 13-week period ending in each of the preceding two calendar years, and equaled or exceeded 5 percent.

(2) The rate of insured unemployment under this part for the period consisting of that week and the 12 weeks immediately preceding the week equaled or exceeded 6 percent, regardless of the rate of insured unemployment in the two previous years.

(3) With respect to weeks of unemployment beginning on or after February 1, 2009, and continuing until the week ending four weeks prior to the last week for which 100 percent federal sharing is authorized by subdivision (a) of Section 2005 of Public Law 111-5 for all claims, except for reimbursable entities described in Section 3306(c)(7) of the Internal Revenue Code, both of the following apply:

(A) The average rate of total unemployment in this state, seasonally adjusted, as determined by the United States Secretary of Labor, for the period consisting of the most recent three
 months for which data for all states are published before the close of that week, equals or exceeds 6.5 percent.

(B) The average rate of total unemployment in this state, seasonally adjusted, as determined by the United States Secretary of Labor, for the three-month period referred to in subparagraph (A) equals or exceeds 110 percent of that average rate of total unemployment for either or both of the corresponding three-month periods ending in the two preceding calendar years.

(4) With respect to weeks of unemployment beginning on or after March 18, 2020, and continuing until the week ending four weeks prior to the last week for which 100 percent federal sharing is authorized by the federal Families First Coronavirus Response Act (Public Law 116-127), which shall be interpreted to retroactively include any subsequent extension of the last week for which 100 percent of federal sharing is authorized under that act and shall take effect as if the amendment extending full federal funding was enacted as part of that act, or for weeks of unemployment ending four weeks prior to the last week for which Congress, pursuant to any future legislation, has authorized 100 percent federal sharing, for all claims, except for reimbursable entities described in Section 3306(c)(7) of the Internal Revenue Code as that section read as of the operative of date of the act adding this paragraph, both of the following apply:

(A) The average rate of total unemployment in this state, seasonally adjusted, as determined by the United States Secretary of Labor, for the period consisting of the most recent three months for which data for all states are published before the close of that week, equals or exceeds 6.5 percent.

(B) The average rate of total unemployment in this state, seasonally
 adjusted, as determined by the United States Secretary of Labor, for the three-month period referred to in subparagraph (A) equals or exceeds 110 percent of that average rate of total unemployment for either or both of the corresponding three-month periods ending in the two preceding calendar years.

(d) There is an “off” indicator for a week if, for the period consisting of that week, and the 12 weeks immediately preceding the week, none of the criteria specified in subdivision (c) results in an “on” indicator.

(e) For purposes of this section, the rate of insured unemployment for a 13-week period shall be determined by reference to the average monthly covered employment for the first four of the most recent six calendar quarters ending before the close of the period.

(f) The indicators specified in subdivisions (c)
 and (d) shall be operative only if mandated or permitted by federal law.

(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, the Governor may, if permitted by federal law, suspend the payment of extended duration benefits under this part, to the extent necessary to ensure that otherwise eligible individuals are not denied, in whole or in part, the receipt of emergency unemployment compensation benefits authorized by the federal Supplemental Appropriations Act of 2008 (Public Law 110-252), the Unemployment Compensation Extension Act of 2008 (Public Law 110-449), and the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5), and that the state receives maximum reimbursement from the federal government for the payment of those emergency benefits.

(h) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (c), with respect to weeks of unemployment beginning on or after December
 19, 2010, and continuing until the earlier of the date authorized by Section 502(b) of Public Law 111-312, or the week ending four weeks prior to the last week for which 100 percent federal sharing is authorized by Section 2005(a) of Public Law 111-5 for all claims, except for reimbursable entities described in Section 3306(c)(7) of the Internal Revenue Code, the following applies:

(1) There is an “on” indicator for purposes of federal-state extended benefits for a week if one of the following applies:

(A) The rate of insured unemployment under this part for the period consisting of that week and the 12 weeks immediately preceding the week equaled or exceeded 120 percent of the average of the rates for the corresponding 13-week period ending in each of the preceding three calendar years, and equaled or exceeded 5 percent.

(B) The rate of insured unemployment under this part for the period consisting of that week and the 12 weeks immediately preceding the week equaled or exceeded 6 percent, regardless of the rate of insured unemployment in the three previous years.

(C) The average rate of total unemployment in this state, seasonally adjusted, as determined by the United States Secretary of Labor, for the period consisting of the most recent three months for which data for all states are published before the close of that week, equals or exceeds 6.5 percent and the average rate of total unemployment in this state, seasonally adjusted, as determined by the United States Secretary of Labor, for the three-month period equals or exceeds 110 percent of that average rate of total unemployment for any or all of the corresponding three-month periods ending in the three preceding calendar years.

(2) There is an “off” indicator for a week if, for the period consisting of that week, and the 12 weeks immediately preceding the week, none of the criteria specified in paragraph (1) results in an “on” indicator.

(3) The indicators specified in paragraphs (1) and (2) shall be operative only if mandated or permitted by federal law.

(i) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, with respect to whether the state is in an extended benefit period beginning on November 1, 2020, through December 31, 2021, as permitted by the Continued Assistance for Unemployed Workers Act of 2020, the requirement in the Federal-State Extended Unemployment Compensation Act of 1970 that no extended benefit period may begin prior to the 14th week following the end of a prior
 extended benefit period which was in effect shall not apply.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, when authorized by federal law to temporarily waive the “off” period, the requirement in the Federal-State Extended Unemployment Compensation Act of 1970 that no extended benefit period may begin prior to the 14th week following the end of a prior extended benefit period which was in effect shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 5, Sec. 12.   (AB 81)   Effective February 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4004.

(a) The department shall establish, for each eligible individual who files an application therefor, an extended compensation account with respect to the individual’s benefit year. The amount established in that account, subject to subdivision (b) of this section, shall be not less than whichever of the following is the least:

(1) Fifty percent of the total amount of regular compensation payable to
 the individual during that benefit year under this division.

(2) Thirteen times the individual’s average weekly benefit amount.

(3) Thirty-nine times the individual’s average weekly benefit amount, reduced by the regular compensation paid to them
 during that benefit year under this division.

(b) The amount determined under subdivision (a) of this section shall be reduced by the aggregate amount of additional compensation paid to the individual under Part 3 (commencing with Section 3501) of this division for prior weeks of unemployment in a benefit year that did not begin in an extended benefit period.

(c) For purposes of subdivision (a) of this section, an individual’s weekly benefit amount for a week is the amount of
 regular compensation under Part 1 (commencing with Section 100) of this division payable to such individual for such week of total unemployment.

(d) With respect to weeks beginning in a high unemployment period, subdivision (a) shall be applied in accordance with the following percentages:

(1) In paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), 80 percent shall be substituted for 50 percent.

(2) In paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), 20 times shall be substituted for 13 times.

(3) In paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), 46 times shall be substituted for 39 times.

(e) For purposes of subdivision (d), “high unemployment period”
 means either of the following:

(1) A period during which an extended benefit period would be in effect if subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 4003 were applied by substituting 8 percent for 6.5 percent.

(2) A period during which an extended benefit period would be in effect if subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 4003 were applied by substituting 8 percent for 6.5 percent.

(f) If
 subdivision (h) of Section 4003 is applicable, for purposes of subdivision (d), “high unemployment period” means a period during which an extended benefit period would be in effect if subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 4003
 was applied by substituting 8 percent for 6.5 percent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 22, Sec. 3.   (AB 103)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Federal-State Extended Benefits [4551. - 4751.]



  ARTICLE 1. Eligibility and Disqualifications [4551. - 4558.]

4551.

Federal-state extended benefits are payable from the Unemployment Fund to unemployed individuals who are eligible under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1156.)
-------------------------------------------

4552.

An unemployed individual is eligible to receive federal-state extended benefits with respect to any week only if the director finds that:

(a) An extended compensation claim has been established for him or her.

(b) The week is within an extended benefit period and his or her eligibility period.

(c) He or she meets the eligibility requirements of Part 1 (commencing with Section 100), except those excluded under subdivision (b) of Section 4002.

(d) He or she is not subject to disqualification for normal benefits under any provision of Part 1 (commencing with Section 100). If the individual has been subject to disqualification under subdivision (b) of Section 1257, he or she has satisfied subdivision (b) of Section 1260 and, during a week following the first week of disqualification, has done either of the following:

(1) Performed service in bona fide employment during a week on a full-time basis.

(2) Performed service in bona fide employment during a week from which service he or she earned remuneration at least equal to his or her weekly benefit amount.

(e) With respect to compensation payable to any individual for any week, he or she had earnings from employment subject to the provisions of this division which exceed 40 times his or her most recent weekly benefit amount or 1.5 times the highest quarter, in the base period in which he or she exhausted all rights to regular compensation.

(f) An individual subject to disqualification under subdivision (a) of Section 1256.4 has satisfied subdivision (a) of Section 1260.

(g) The amendments to subdivision (e) made by the act adding this subdivision shall not be implemented unless the director determines that those amendments have been approved by the United States Department of Labor. The director shall immediately seek approval of the amendments to subdivision (e) from the United States Department of Labor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 22, Sec. 3.   Effective March 27, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

4553.

An unemployed individual is disqualified for federal-state extended benefits if the individual, without good cause, refused to accept suitable work when offered to the individual, or failed to apply for suitable work when referred by a public employment office.

(a) For purposes of this section, the term “suitable work” means any work which is within the individual’s capabilities.

(b) An individual shall not be disqualified under this section if any of the following apply:

(1) The gross average weekly remuneration payable to the individual for the position offered or to which referred, does not exceed the individual’s weekly benefit amount plus the amount of any additional benefits (as defined in Section 501(c)(17)(D) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954) payable to such individual for such week.

(2) The position was not offered to such individual in writing and was not listed with a public employment office.

(3) The provisions of subdivision (a), (b), or (c) of Section 1259 or the provisions of Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 1266) or Article 1.8 (commencing with Section 1274) of Chapter 5 of Part 1 apply.

(4) The position pays less than the federal or state minimum wage, whichever is higher.

(5) The department determines that the individual’s prospects for obtaining work in his or her customary occupation within a reasonably short period are good. 

(c) If the department makes a determination described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (b), the determination of whether any work is “suitable work” and whether there is a disqualification from benefits with respect to the individual shall be made in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 1257, Sections 1258, 1258.5, and 1259, and subdivision (b) of Section 1260.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1134, Sec. 8.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 4558.)
-------------------------------------------

4554.

An individual is disqualified for federal-state extended benefits if the individual fails to actively engage in seeking work.

(a) For purposes of this section, an individual shall be treated as actively engaged in seeking work during any week if both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The individual has engaged in a systematic and sustained effort to obtain work during the week.

(2) The individual provides tangible evidence to the department that he or she has engaged in such an effort during the week.

(b) An individual shall not be disqualified under this section for any week in which the individual is in a training or retraining program under Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 1266) of Chapter 5 of Part 1.

(c) An individual shall not be disqualified under this section for any week solely because the individual is before any court of the United States or any state pursuant to a lawfully issued summons to appear for jury duty, or the individual is hospitalized for treatment of an emergency or life-threatening condition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 716, Sec. 6.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 4558.)
-------------------------------------------

4555.

If an individual is disqualified for federal-state extended benefits under Section 4553 or 4554 pursuant to a determination transmitted to him or her by the department, the individual shall be ineligible to receive federal-state extended benefits:

(a) Beginning with the week in which the disqualifying act occurs, and

(b) Continuing until the individual has, during at least four weeks subsequent to the week in which the disqualifying act occurred, performed services in bona fide employment for which remuneration is earned equal to or in excess of four times the individual’s weekly benefit amount.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1134, Sec. 9.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 4558.)
-------------------------------------------

4556.

When the department refers individuals who have applied for federal-state extended benefits to work, the referrals shall include suitable work, as defined by subdivision (a) of Section 4553, to which any part of subdivision (b) of Section 4553 would not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 10, Sec. 5.   Effective March 31, 1981.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 4558.)
-------------------------------------------

4557.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), payment of federal-state extended compensation shall not be made to any individual for any week if both of the following apply:

(1) Extended compensation would, but for this section, have been payable for such week pursuant to an interstate claim filed in any state under the interstate benefit payment plan.

(2) An extended benefit period is not in effect for such week in such state. 

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply with respect to the first two weeks for which extended compensation is payable as determined without regard to this section, pursuant to an interstate claim filed under the interstate benefit payment plan to the individual from the extended compensation account established with respect to the benefit year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 10, Sec. 6.   Effective March 31, 1981.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 4558.)
-------------------------------------------

4558.

Sections 4553 to 4557, inclusive, and the amendments made to Section 4552 by legislation enacted during the 1981 portion of the 1981–82 Regular Session of the Legislature shall be operative only during such time as Section 202 of the Federal-State Extended Unemployment Compensation Act of 1970 requires that state unemployment insurance laws contain such provisions as a condition of certification of state unemployment insurance laws by the Secretary of Labor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 10, Sec. 7.   Effective March 31, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Computation (Amount and Duration) [4601. - 4601.]

4601.

The computation of the amount and duration of federal-state extended benefits shall be in accordance with Section 4004.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1156.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Filing, Determination, and Payment of Federal-State Extended Benefit Claims [4651. - 4656.]

4651.

Claims for federal-state extended benefits shall be made as provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1156.)
-------------------------------------------

4652.

(a) An individual who desires to claim federal-state extended benefits shall file a valid application. An application for federal-state extended benefits shall be valid only if its effective date is within an extended benefit period and his eligibility period and the individual filing it otherwise meets the requirements of Section 4001. For the purpose of determining whether an application is a “valid application” within the meaning of this section, an individual otherwise unemployed shall be deemed unemployed even though wages, as defined in Section 1252, which are for a period subsequent to the termination of performance of services are payable with respect to the week for which he files the application.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1156.)
-------------------------------------------

4653.

The effective date of a valid application shall be determined in the same manner as the effective date of a new claim for normal benefits pursuant to Section 1326.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1156.)
-------------------------------------------

4654.

The department shall give a notice of the filing of an application or an additional claim to the employing unit by which the individual was last employed immediately preceding the filing of the application or claim unless the additional claim is the result of the filing of a partial claim as defined by the department, there has not been a subsequent employing unit which is designated as the last employer, and there is no separation issue. The employing unit so notified shall submit within 10 days after the mailing of the notice any facts then known which may affect the individual’s eligibility for federal-state extended benefits. The 10-day period may be extended for good cause. If after the 10-day period the employing unit acquires knowledge of facts which may affect the eligibility of the individual and those facts could not reasonably have been known within the period, the employing unit shall within 10 days of acquiring that knowledge submit those facts to the department, and the 10-day period may also be extended for good cause.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 716, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

4655.

(a) The Employment Development Department shall consider the facts submitted by an employer pursuant to Section 4654 and, if benefits are claimed subsequent to the filing of the federal-state extended benefits claim, make a determination as to the individual’s eligibility for the federal-state extended benefits. The Employment Development Department shall promptly notify the individual and any employer who prior to the determination has submitted any facts pursuant to Section 4654 of the determination and the reasons therefor. The individual and this employer may appeal therefrom to an administrative law judge within 30 days from service of notice of the determination. The 30-day period may be extended for good cause. The Director of Employment Development shall be an interested party to any appeal.

(b) “Good cause,” as used in this section, shall include, but not be limited to, mistake, inadvertence, surprise, or excusable neglect.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2015.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 67, Sec. 39.   (SB 191)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4656.

(a) Upon the filing of a valid application by an individual, the department shall promptly make a federal-state extended benefit award computation that shall set forth the maximum amount of federal-state extended benefits potentially payable during the extended benefit period, and the weekly benefit amount. The department shall promptly notify the individual of the computation. The individual may, within 30 days after the service of the notice of computation or recomputation, protest its accuracy. The 30-day period may be extended for good cause. The department shall consider this protest and shall promptly notify the individual of the recomputation or denial of recomputation. An appeal may be taken from a notice of denial of recomputation in the manner provided in Section 4655. The director shall be an interested party to any appeal.

(b) “Good cause,” as used in this section, shall include, but not be limited to, mistake, inadvertence, surprise, or excusable neglect.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2015.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 67, Sec. 40.   (SB 191)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Reserve Accounts [4701. - 4702.]

4701.

(a) (1) An employer that is entitled under Section 4654 to notice of the filing of an application or additional claim and who, within 10 days after mailing of the notice, submits to the department any facts within its possession disclosing whether the individual left the most recent employment with the employer voluntarily and without good cause or was discharged from the employment for misconduct connected with their work, or whether the claimant was a student employed on a temporary basis and whose employment began within, and ended with their leaving to return to school at the close of, their vacation period, or whether the claimant left the employer’s employ to accompany their spouse or domestic partner to a place or to join their spouse at a place from which it is impractical to commute to the employment, and to which a transfer of the claimant by the employer is not available, or whether the claimant’s discharge or quit from their most recent employer was the result of an irresistible compulsion to use or consume intoxicants, including alcoholic beverages, or whether the claimant left the employer’s employ to protect their family or themselves from domestic violence abuse, or whether the claimant left the employer’s employ to take a substantially better job, shall be entitled to a ruling as prescribed by this section. The period during which the employer may submit these facts may be extended by the director for good cause.

(2) For purposes of this section, “spouse” includes a person to whom marriage is imminent, and “domestic partner” includes a person to whom a domestic partnership, as described in Section 297 of the Family Code, is imminent.

(b) The department shall consider the facts together with any information in its possession. If the employer is entitled to a determination pursuant to Section 4655, the department shall
 promptly issue to the employer its ruling as to the cause of the termination of the individual’s most recent employment. The employer may appeal from a ruling or reconsidered ruling to an administrative law judge within 30 days after service of notice of the ruling or reconsidered ruling. The 30-day period may be extended for good cause, which shall include, but not be limited to, mistake, inadvertence, surprise, or excusable neglect. The director shall be an interested party to an appeal. The department may for good cause reconsider a ruling or reconsidered ruling within either five days after the date an appeal to an administrative law judge is filed or, if no appeal is filed, within 30 days after service of notice of the ruling or reconsidered ruling, except that a ruling or reconsidered ruling that relates to a determination that is reconsidered pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1332 may also be reconsidered by the department within the time provided for reconsideration of that determination.

(c) For purposes of this section only, if the claimant voluntarily leaves the employer’s employ without notification to the employer of the reasons therefor, and if the employer submits all of the facts within its possession concerning the leaving within the applicable time period referred to in this section, the leaving shall be presumed to be without good cause.

(d) An individual whose employment is terminated under the compulsory retirement provisions of a collective bargaining agreement to which the
 employer is a party shall not be deemed to have voluntarily left their employment without good cause.

(e) Rulings under this section shall have the effect prescribed by Section 1032.

(f) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2015.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 67, Sec. 41.   (SB 191)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4702.

Federal-state extended benefits, to the extent that these extended benefits are not reimbursed or reimbursable by the federal government to the State of California, shall be charged except as provided by Section 1032, 1032.5, 1034, 1036, 1335, 1338, or 1380, against the reserve account of the individual’s employer during his or her base period. If the individual performed services in employment for more than one employer during his or her base period, unemployment compensation benefits paid to him or her shall be charged against the respective reserve accounts of such employers in the proportion that the total wages paid to the individual in employment for each employer bears to the total wages paid to the individual in employment for all employers during the base period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1169, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Overpayments [4751. - 4751.]

4751.

The provisions of Article 4 (commencing with Section 1375) of Chapter 5 of Part 1 of this division are modified in the following respects:

(a) In the absence of fraud, misrepresentation, or willful nondisclosure, the notice of overpayment of federal-state extended benefits shall be served by the Employment Development Department not later than one year after the close of the extended benefit period in which the overpayment was made.

(b) The Director of Employment Development may offset an overpayment of extended duration benefits, or federal-state extended benefits, or unemployment compensation benefits against any of such three types of benefits or against disability benefits to which the liable person may become entitled under this division. The Director of Employment Development may offset the amount of any such overpayments within any of the periods prescribed by subdivision (b) of Section 1379, and further within the current extended duration period or current extended benefit period or any extended benefit period or extended duration period which begins during the three-year period next succeeding the date of the service of such notice of overpayment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 67, Sec. 42.   (SB 191)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 1.5. AUTOMATION OF THE EMPLOYMENT DEVELOPMENT DEPARTMENT [4900. - 4903.]



CHAPTER 1. Annual Reports [4900. - 4903.]

4900.

As used in this division:

(a) “Department” means the Employment Development Department.

(b) “Director” means the Director of Employment Development.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 799, Sec. 3.   Effective September 15, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

4901.

The director shall prepare a biennial report to the Legislature, on or before February 1, 1994, and on or before February 1 of each even-numbered year thereafter, on the department’s automation plans, including any recommendation on improvements for the purpose of consideration by both policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 713, Sec. 28.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

4902.

The report, required by Section 4901, shall be transmitted to the Legislative Analyst, the Assembly Committees on Insurance, Labor and Employment, and Budget, the Senate Committees on Industrial Relations and Budget and Fiscal Review, the Department of Finance, and the Governor, on or before February 1 of each even-numbered year. The report shall do all of the following:

(a) Provide a strategic information technology plan that describes the long-term goals and strategies which shall be undertaken by the department to create an information technology environment that will not only support the achievement of the department’s strategic business mission and goals but
 set the foundation for using information technology to make substantial and sustainable improvements in how it conducts business. The plan shall cover a 10-year planning horizon and include the department’s information vision, its information management principles, and long-term goals and strategies for achieving its information vision.

(b) Provide a tactical information plan of specific automation and infrastructure projects to be undertaken within three years of the date of the report. The plan shall include project description and scope, consistency with the strategic information plan, relationship to other projects, priority of development, estimated project costs and benefits, and improvements in services. For automation projects, it shall also provide reductions in personnel and operating costs, and identification of how personnel and
 cost savings will be used, transferred, or otherwise accounted for.

(c) Not necessarily be in addition to or replace any reports now submitted by the director to the California Department of Technology.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 224, Sec. 5.   (AB 1514)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4903.

(a) Thirty days prior to the release of the report identified in Section 4901, the director shall submit it to the California Department of Technology, which shall review and comment on it. These comments shall be attached to the report by the director and distributed with the report.

(b) When commenting on the report, the
 California Department of Technology shall include, but not be limited to, an assessment of whether:

(1) The requirements for the report have been met.

(2) The strategic plan is consistent with the formal strategic plan submitted separately to the California Department of Technology.

(3) The costs and benefits identified in the report are consistent with the projects previously submitted for approval or contained in the Information Management Annual Plans.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 224, Sec. 6.   (AB 1514)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 3. EMPLOYMENT SERVICES PROGRAMS [9000. - 11024.]



PART 1. EMPLOYMENT AND EMPLOYABILITY SERVICES [9000. - 11024.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [9000. - 9115.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [9000. - 9004.]

9000.

The Legislature hereby makes the following declaration of purpose and intent in enacting the Employment Development Act of 1973.
